Massachusetts, session 194th, H877.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8 of chapter 53 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after "electors,", in line 15, the following
sentence:-
One presidential elector shall be chosen from each congressional district, and two
presidential electors shall be chosen at-large.
SECTION 2. Chapter 54 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out section 148, and inserting in place thereof the following section:—
Section 148. The persons chosen as presidential electors shall meet at the state house on
the date fixed by federal law next following their election at three o’clock in the afternoon and
of 2

organize by the choice of a presiding officer and secretary. The state secretary shall call the
meeting to order, call the roll of electors, and preside until a presiding officer shall be chosen.
The secretary of the electors shall keep a journal of their proceedings and deposit the same in the
office of the state secretary, where it shall be recorded and filed. Each at-large presidential
elector shall cast their ballot for the presidential and vice-presidential candidates whose electors
received the highest number of votes in the state. Each congressional district presidential elector
shall cast their ballot for the presidential and vice-presidential candidates whose electors received
the highest number of votes in their congressional district.
of 2